trunk/apertium-oldca-XX/apertium-oldca-XX.oldca.dix
    <pardef n="CM_CORRER">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>córrer</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>córrer</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corrent</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corrent</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corregu</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="partpi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl_femT"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corro</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corre</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pi1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corre</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corri</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_ii1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corrí</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>correr</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>correguí</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>correguer</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pp1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corregué</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>correguér</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corr</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_ps_or"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corr</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corregué</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_impsbj_és"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corregue</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_impsbj_es"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>correr</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_cond"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corre</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corri</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>correm</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>correu</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corrin</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corre</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corri</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>correm</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>correu</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>corrin</l>
          <r>córrer<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <par n="CM_CORRER"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>o</i>
        <par n="CM_CORRER"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>con</i>
        <par n="CM_CORRER"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>re</i>
        <par n="CM_CORRER"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>in</i>
        <par n="CM_CORRER"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>so</i>
        <par n="CM_CORRER"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>trans</i>
        <par n="CM_CORRER"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>dis</i>
        <par n="CM_CORRER"/>
      </e>
